District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-201.12

Certificate of capital stock paid in.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1286, ch. 854, § 616
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-201.12.
1981 Ed., § 29-212.
1973 Ed., § 29-212.